Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Burglary and Criminal Intrusion

Cross references. —

As to identification of vehicles and prevention of theft, see §§

31-11-101

to

31-11-111

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Burglary in Wyoming,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 721 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Burglary, breaking or entering of motor vehicle, 72 ALR4th 710.

Belief that burglary is in progress or has recently been committed as exigent circumstance justifying warrantless search of premises, 64 ALR5th 637.